Alaska, session 34, SB228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 14.30 is amended by adding a new section to read: 06 Sec. 14.30.363. Opioid abuse awareness and prevention curriculum. (a) 07 The department shall develop an opioid abuse awareness and prevention curriculum 08 for students in grades six through 12 relating to the dangers associated with, and the 09 physical, psychological, and physiological consequences related to, opioid abuse and 10 opioid addiction. The curriculum must provide at least 60 minutes of instruction 11 annually relating to opioid abuse awareness and prevention, including 12 (1) the dangers of using opioids, including drugs that may contain 13 fentanyl; 14 (2) awareness of opioids that target children, including drugs 01 containing fentanyl that are designed to look like candy; 02 (3) the science related to using opioids, including drugs that contain 03 fentanyl; 04 (4) prevention of opioid abuse, including safe use of opioid 05 prescription medications; and 06 (5) detection of early warning signs related to opioid addiction in 07 school-aged children. 08 (b) In developing the curriculum, the department shall consult with 09 (1) the Department of Health; 10 (2) state and tribal entities and state residents that have experience in 11 reducing, preventing, and responding to opioid overdoses, including overdoses caused 12 by drugs containing fentanyl; and 13 (3) family members of individuals who have had an opioid overdose, 14 including overdoses caused by drugs containing fentanyl. 15 (c) Each school district shall teach the curriculum 16 (1) to students in grades six through 12; and 17 (2) during, or as close as practicable to, the last week in October. 18 (d) In this section, 19 (1) "curriculum" means the opioid abuse awareness and prevention 20 curriculum described in (a) of this section; 21 (2) "drugs" has the meaning given in AS 47.37.270; 22 (3) "opioid" has the meaning given in AS 17.20.085(g); 23 (4) "opioid abuse" and "opioid addiction" mean 24 (A) a physiological or psychological dependency, or both, on 25 an opioid; or 26 (B) habitual lack of self-control in using opioids to the extent 27 that a person's health is substantially impaired or a person's social or economic 28 function is substantially disrupted; 29 (5) "school district" has the meaning given in AS 14.30.350. 30 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 31 read: 01 NATIONAL OPIOID SETTLEMENT FUNDS. Within six months after the effective 02 date of this Act, the Department of Health shall present a proposal to the committee 03 established in the Department of Health that is responsible for advising the department on the 04 allocation of funds received from the national opioid settlement. The proposal must request 05 that the committee approve the allocation of funds received from the settlement to the 06 Department of Education and Early Development to develop the curriculum required under 07 AS 14.30.363, enacted by sec. 1 of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.